ga/braille/ga-g2.ctb
#liblouis Irish Contracted Braille code
# www.inbaf.ie Irish Grade 2 Braille  Version 1.1 27th April 2015
# Braille Gaelach Giorraithe
# Maintained by Ronan McGuirk ronan.p.mcguirk@gmail.com
# Based on the braille contraction modules in BRLTTY
#
# Original copyright (C) 1995-2004 by The BRLTTY Team. 
# All rights reserved.
#
# liblouis copyright 2004 by 
# ViewPlus Technologies, inc.,  www.viewplustech.com
# and
# Computers to Help People, Inc., www.chpi.org  
# All rights reserved.
#
#
#  This file is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#   under the terms of the Lesser or Library GNU General Public License 
#  as published by the
#  Free Software Foundation; either version 3, or (at your option) any
#  later version.
# 
#  This file is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the 
#  Library GNU General Public License for more details.
#
#

include ga-g1.utb
always ar 	345
word bíonn  	12
word bhíonn 	12-125
word braille 	12-1235-123
word cathain	14
always ch 	16
word chuaigh 	16
begword con 25
word déanamh 	145
word dhéanamh 	145-125
begword dis 256
word ea 15-1
midword ea 2
midendword ear 15-345 
always ed 1246
always er 12456
word eile 	15
always en	26
word féidir 	124
word fhéidir 	124-125
word gach 	1245
always gh 	126
word gheobhaidh 	126
word halla 	125
always in 	35
midendword ing 	346
word leis 	123
word maith 	134
word mhaith 	134-125
word nuair 	1345
word oíche 	135
always ou 1256
always ow 246
word píosa 	1234
word phíosa 	1234-125
word raibh 	1235
word agus 	234
always sh 	146
word shampla 	146
always st 	34
word tabhair 	2345
always th 	1456
word tháinig 	1456
word uaireanta 	136
word véarsa 	1236
always wh 156
# exceptions where contractions are not to be used 
begword aingh 1-35-126
always liaingh 123-24-1-35-126
begword coing 14-135-35-1245
always cráing 14-1235-12346-35-1245
always éacs 	123456-1-14-234
always féing 124-123456-35-1245
always féingh 124-123456-35-126
always saing 234-1-35-1245
begword uaingh 136-1-35-126


   	

 
